Maine, session 132, LD397.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §112-A, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 253, §11, is
amended to read:
2. Other government-issued identification document. A government-issued
identification document without a photograph, including, but not limited to, a certified birth
certificate or a signed social security card; or
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §112-A, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2021, c. 246, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 3. 21-A MRSA §112-A, sub-§3-A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 246, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 4. 21-A MRSA §671, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2019, c. 371, §20, is further
amended to read:
1. Name announced; photograph identification. A voter who wishes to vote must
present proof of identity in the form of a photograph identification document or a special
voter photograph identification card pursuant to subsection 9 and state the voter's name and
residence address to an election clerk, who shall announce the name in a loud, clear voice.
If the voter's stated residence address is different from the residence address listed on the
incoming voting list, the voter must be directed to complete an updated voter registration
application before voting.
Sec. 5. 21-A MRSA §671, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Special voter photograph identification card. A voter who wishes to vote and
who does not possess a photograph identification document may request from the Secretary
of State a special voter photograph identification card, which must be issued free of charge
and is valid for voter identification under this section. The Secretary of State shall establish
procedures through rulemaking for the issuance of special voter photograph identification
cards under this subsection. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical
rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 6. 21-A MRSA §671, as amended by PL 2021, c. 750, §9 and affected by §14
is further amended by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
For purposes of this section, "photograph identification document" means a current and
valid driver's license or nondriver identification card issued in this State, a United States
passport, a military identification or a permit to carry a concealed handgun issued under
Title 25, chapter 252 if that permit includes a photograph. "Photograph identification
document" does not include an identification issued by a college or university in this State.
Sec. 7. 21-A MRSA §752, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Form of photograph identification notice. The Secretary of State shall design or
approve the form of notice informing the voter that a copy of a photograph identification
document must be submitted with the absentee ballot in accordance with section 754-B.
Sec. 8. 21-A MRSA §754-B is enacted to read:
§754-B. Photograph identification required
Page 1 - 132LR0591(01)

1. Photograph identification document defined. For the purposes of this section,
"photograph identification document" has the same meaning as in section 671, subsection
1.
2. Photograph identification. A voter who wishes to vote by absentee ballot shall
submit with the absentee ballot proof of identity in the form of a copy of a photograph
identification document or a special voter photograph identification card as described in
subsection 3.
3. Special voter photograph identification. A voter who wishes to vote by absentee
ballot and who does not possess a photograph identification document may request from
the Secretary of State a special voter photograph identification card pursuant to section 671,
subsection 9.
4. Rules. The Secretary of State shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 9. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.